dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="ח/ך__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כנו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ככם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ככן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כה</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כים</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כינו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כייך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיכם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיכן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיהן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיה</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיהם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="דעים__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="של/יו__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווי</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וונו</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווך</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווך</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווכם</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווכן</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וון</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וו</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווה</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וום</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווים</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווי</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויי</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווינו</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויך</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ווייך</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויכם</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויכן</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויהן</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויו</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויה</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>וויהם</l><r>יו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="נתך"><i>נת</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ספגטי"><i>ספגטי</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מלאך"><i>מלא</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מדריך"><i>מדרי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בלינצ'ס"><i>בלינצ'ס</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מסמך"><i>מסמ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שפך"><i>שפ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שרוך"><i>שרו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קלמרי"><i>קלמרי</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אברך"><i>אבר</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ממשיך"><i>ממשי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מצרך"><i>מצר</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מוסך"><i>מוס</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="היפוך"><i>היפו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משפך"><i>משפ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מנשך"><i>מנש</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חתך"><i>חת</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מלך"><i>מל</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חתיך"><i>חתי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הלך"><i>הל</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מהלך"><i>מהל</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תדריך"><i>תדרי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שמונצס"><i>שמונצס</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מחשך"><i>מחש</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פלך"><i>פל</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נסיך"><i>נסי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חושך"><i>חוש</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מחוך"><i>מחו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קומיקס"><i>קומיקס</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מחנך"><i>מחנ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הילוך"><i>הילו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פפרצי"><i>פפרצי</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משך"><i>מש</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נסך"><i>נס</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כרך"><i>כר</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סתיו"><i>סת</i><par n="של/יו__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מבוך"><i>מבו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מערך"><i>מער</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נתיך"><i>נתי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מסך"><i>מס</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רתך"><i>רת</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הליך"><i>הלי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הפך"><i>הפ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תהליך"><i>תהלי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כעך"><i>כע</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אנך"><i>אנ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיוך"><i>חיו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סבך"><i>סב</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תדרוך"><i>תדרו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תשליך"><i>תשלי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רוגלך"><i>רוגלך</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חניך"><i>חני</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שליו"><i>של</i><par n="של/יו__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לילך"><i>ליל</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תומך"><i>תומ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סברס"><i>סברס</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כוך"><i>כו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שובך"><i>שוב</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חינוך"><i>חינו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תאריך"><i>תארי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חך"><i>ח</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="היתוך"><i>היתו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיתוך"><i>שיתו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אורך"><i>אור</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מערוך"><i>מערו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לכלוך"><i>לכלו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מהפך"><i>מהפ</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ממעך"><i>ממע</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חרך"><i>חר</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חסך"><i>חס</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תסמיך"><i>תסמי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עורך"><i>עור</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ערך"><i>ער</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תסביך"><i>תסבי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פלילים"><i>פלילים</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גנזך"><i>גנז</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פטריארך"><i>פטריאר</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דעים"><i>דעים</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיתוך"><i>חיתו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מוליך"><i>מולי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תנוך"><i>תנו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="המשך"><i>המש</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תכריך"><i>תכרי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עונשין"><i>עונשין</i><par n="דעים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיבוך"><i>סיבו</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כריך"><i>כרי</i><par n="ח/ך__n_m"/></e>
